Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-229
State trust company; merger or consolidation with a national bank; redemption of stock; when; value, how determined.

When the merger or consolidation becomes effective, the owner of shares of a state trust company which were voted against a merger or consolidation with a national bank shall be entitled to receive the value of the stock in cash from the assets of the state trust company when the merger or consolidation becomes effective, upon written demand made to the resulting national bank and trust company at any time within thirty days after the effective date of the merger or consolidation, accompanied by the surrender of the stock certificates. The value of the shares shall be determined as of the date of the shareholders' meeting approving the merger or consolidation, by three appraisers, one to be selected by the owners of two-thirds of the shares voting against the merger or consolidation, one by the board of directors of the resulting national bank and trust company, and the third by the two so chosen. If the appraisal is not completed within sixty days after the merger or consolidation becomes effective, the Department of Banking and Finance may cause an appraisal to be made and the resulting appraisal shall then govern. The expenses of the appraisal caused to be made by the department shall be paid by the resulting national bank and trust company.

Laws 1959, c. 20, § 3, p. 146;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 45.